New Jersey, session 222, S3234.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Department of Transportation shall maintain the roadways that surround the State capitol complex, including: West State Street from Calhoun Street to South Warren Street; West Lafayette Street from Barrack Street to South Warren Street; Barrack Street from West State Street to Memorial Drive; and Memorial Drive. Maintenance of these roadways shall include road paving and snow plowing.  To assist in fulfilling the requirements of this section, the department may consult or contract with any State agency, county, or municipality that is responsible for maintaining the adjoining portion of each of the roadways. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.